Hawaii statutes.
§464-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Architect" means a person who holds
oneself out as able to perform, or who does perform, any professional service
such as consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, design, including
aesthetic and structural design, or observation of construction, in connection
with any private or public buildings, structures, or projects or the equipment
or utilities thereof, or the accessories thereto, wherein the safeguarding of
life, health, or property is concerned or involved, when the professional
service requires the application of the art and science of construction based
upon the principles of mathematics, aesthetics, and the physical sciences.

"Landscape architect" means a person
who holds oneself out as able to perform, or who does perform, any professional
services such as consultation, investigation, reconnaissance, research, design,
preparation of drawings and specifications, and observation of construction
where the dominant purpose of the services is:

(1) The preservation and enhancement of land uses and
natural land features;

(2) The location and construction of aesthetically
pleasing and functional approaches for structures, roadways, and walkways; and

(3) The design for equestrian trails, plantings,
landscape irrigation, landscape lighting, and landscape grading.

This practice shall include the location,
arrangement, and design of tangible objects and features as are incidental and
necessary to the purposes outlined herein. Nothing herein shall preclude a
duly licensed landscape architect from planning the development of land areas
and elements used thereon or from performing any of the services described in
this section in connection with the settings, approaches, or environment for
buildings, structures, or facilities; provided that nothing in this chapter
shall empower a landscape architect licensed under this chapter from practicing
or offering to practice architecture or engineering in any of its various
recognized branches.

"Land surveying" means any
professional service or work which involves the application of specialized
knowledge of the principles of mathematics, the physical and applied sciences,
and the act of measuring, locating, establishing, or reestablishing lines,
angles, elevations, natural and manmade features on the surface and immediate
subsurface of the earth, or on the beds or surface of bodies of water, for the
purpose of determining, establishing, describing, displaying, or interpreting
the size, shape, topography, elevation datum planes, legal or geodetic location
or relocation, or orientation of improved or unimproved real property and
appurtenances thereto, including acreage. Land surveying includes but is not
limited to:

(1) Evaluating and determining boundary evidence
collected through field surveys, boundary studies, or other means;

(2) Using the principles of land surveying to:

(A) Determine the position for any monument
or reference point which marks a property line, boundary corner, right-of-way,
easement, or alignment of those lines;

(B) Set, reset, recover, or replace any such
monument or reference point; or

(C) Perform topographical surveys;

(3) Giving an authoritative reference or
interpretation as to the location of a property line, boundary, right‑of-way,
easement, or any related corner position;

(4) Creating or modifying record plats for cadastral
surveys including consolidation, subdivision, resubdivision, rights-of-way,
easements, determination of areas, mathematical closures, and elevations of land
parcels;

(5) Creating or modifying land surveying descriptions
of property lines and easements, or editing their content for use in legal
instruments that convey real property and property rights;

(6) Rendering a statement or certification regarding
the positional accuracy of land surveying maps, record drawings, field surveys,
or measured survey data;

(7) Creating or modifying the content of electronic
data, computerized drawings, or any other survey map relative to the practice
of land surveying; or

(8) Setting, resetting, or replacing initial survey
control points, including benchmarks to provide horizontal and vertical data on
or in the vicinity of a construction or engineering project to enable any
components of the project to be built in compliance with plans and
specifications with respect to the project location, orientation, elevation,
and relationship to property lines, easements, or right-of-way boundaries.

This definition shall not apply to any person
working within the scope of practice of another licensed profession; provided
that the person does not purport to be a land surveyor.

"Professional engineer" means a
person who holds oneself out as able to perform, or who does perform, any
professional service such as consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning,
design, or observation of construction or operation, in connection with any
public or private utilities, structures, buildings, machines, equipment,
processes, works, or projects, wherein the safeguarding of life, health, or property
is concerned or involved, when such professional service requires the
application of engineering principles and data.

"Professional surveyor",
"professional land surveyor", or "land surveyor" means a
person who holds oneself out as able to practice, or who does practice, land
surveying in this State. [L 1933, c 134, §5; RL 1935, §7034; RL 1945, §7601; am
L 1949, c 306, §1; RL 1955, §166-1; HRS §464-1; am L 1970, c 85, §2; gen ch
1985; am L 1988, c 226, §1; am L 1989, c 210, §3; am L 2012, c 79, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next